Missouri, session 2026, HB2228.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 29, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 29.233, to read as follows:
29.233. 1. The state auditor shall conduct performance audits for economy and
efficiency at least once every four years on each of the state departments, the general
assembly, the judiciary, and departments and offices under the executive branch
including, but not limited to, the office of administration, the governor, the lieutenant
governor, the attorney general, the secretary of state, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer.
2. Within thirty days of receiving the results of the audit, the entity shall post the
results on its website.
3. The state auditor shall submit the results of each audit to the general
assembly.
4. Any entity that fails to participate in the audits required under subsection 1 of
this section shall be subject to suit for declaratory judgment and injunctive relief,
brought by the attorney general in the circuit court of Cole County. The entity shall not
have use of the attorney general's legal services for such suit and shall be required to
retain its own counsel.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.